Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
12-2-8. Promulgation of minimum standards and procedures for protection of natural resources, environment, and vital areas of state; stream and reservoir buffers.

The local governments of the State of Georgia are of vital importance to the state and its citizens. The state has an essential public interest in promoting, developing, sustaining, and assisting local governments. The natural resources, environment, and vital areas of the state are also of vital importance to the state and its citizens. The state has an essential public interest in establishing minimum standards for land use in order to protect and preserve its natural resources, environment, and vital areas. The purpose of this Code section is to provide for the department to serve these essential public interests of the state. This Code section shall be liberally construed to achieve its purpose. This Code section is enacted pursuant to the authority granted the General Assembly in the Constitution of the State of Georgia, including, but not limited to, the authority provided in Article III, Section VI, Paragraphs I and II(a)(1) and Article IX, Section II, Paragraphs III and IV.

The department is therefore authorized to develop minimum standards and procedures, in accordance with paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 50-8-7.1 and in accordance with the procedures provided in Code Section 50-8-7.2 for the promulgation of minimum standards and procedures, for the protection of the natural resources, environment, and vital areas of the state, including, but not limited to, the protection of mountains, the protection of river corridors, the protection of watersheds of streams and reservoirs which are to be used for public water supply, for the protection of the purity of ground water, and for the protection of wetlands, which minimum standards and procedures shall be used by local governments in developing, preparing, and implementing their comprehensive plans as that term is defined in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 50-8-2.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Land-disturbing activity" means any grading, scraping, excavating, or filling of land; clearing of vegetation; and any construction, rebuilding, or alteration of a structure. Land-disturbing activity shall not include activities such as ordinary maintenance and landscaping operations, individual home gardens, yard and grounds upkeep, repairs, additions or minor modifications to a single-family residence, and the cutting of firewood for personal use.

"Mountain" or "protected mountain" means all land area 2,200 feet or more above mean sea level that has a percentage slope of 25 percent or greater for at least 500 feet horizontally and shall include the crests, summits, and ridge tops which lie at elevations higher than any such area.

"River corridor" means all land not regulated under Code Sections 12-5-440 through 12-5-457, and Part 4 of Article 4 of Chapter 5 of this title, the "Coastal Marshlands Protection Act of 1970," in the areas of a perennial stream or watercourse with an average annual flow of at least 400 cubic feet per second as defined by the United States Geologic Survey and being within 100 feet on both sides of the river as measured from the river banks at mean high water.

The minimum standards and procedures for watershed protection referred to in subsection (b) of this Code section shall specifically include, but shall not be limited to, buffer areas along streams and reservoirs, land development densities, and land use activities. Local governments shall submit for approval by the department a watershed protection plan which shall include watershed protection standards and procedures. The department may adopt differing minimum standards and procedures of watershed protection based on the size of the watershed, the size or flow volume of the stream or reservoir, and whether or not the actual use of the municipal water supply is existing or proposed. Standards and procedures for buffer areas along streams and reservoirs shall comply with subsection (b) of this Code section and Code Section 12-7-6.

The minimum standards and procedures for protection of ground water referred to in subsection (b) of this Code section shall also specifically include, but shall not be limited to, land use activities and development densities for the protection of ground water. The department may adopt differing minimum standards and procedures for ground-water purity protection based on the relative sizes, depths, and water volumes of various aquifers and based on the relative susceptibility of ground water to contamination by various land use activities and development densities.

The minimum standards and procedures for protection of wetlands referred to in subsection (b) of this Code section shall include, but shall not be limited to, land use activities, land development densities, and activities which involve alteration of wetlands. The department may adopt differing minimum standards and procedures for wetlands protection based on the size or type of wetlands, the need to protect endangered or protected species or other unusual resources, and the need for a particular land use activity which will affect a wetland.

The department shall, by January 1, 1992, promulgate the minimum standards and procedures for protection of river corridors referred to in subsection (b) of this Code section including, but not limited to, regulated activities within river corridor areas. In promulgating such standards, the department may classify river corridor areas and activities by type, size, and other factors relevant to the advancement of the policies and purposes of this Code section. Such standards shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

Perennial river corridors shall be protected by the following criteria:

A natural vegetative buffer area shall be maintained for a distance of 100 feet on both sides of the stream as measured from the stream banks; provided, however, that nothing in such standards shall prohibit or be construed to prohibit the building of a single-family dwelling, including the usual appurtenances thereto, within said area subject to the following conditions: (i) such dwelling must be in compliance with all other local zoning regulations; (ii) a septic tank or tanks serving such dwelling may be located in said area but the drainfield for any such tank or tanks must be outside said area; and (iii) any such dwelling must be located on a tract containing at least two acres of land and there shall be only one such dwelling on each such two-acre or larger tract;

Except as expressly provided otherwise in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, septic tanks and septic tank drainfields are prohibited within such set-back area; and

Such criteria shall provide for encroachments into the buffer area as needed for the construction of public roads and public utility crossings of river corridors and must meet all applicable requirements of Chapter 7 of this title, the "Erosion and Sedimentation Act of 1975," and of any applicable local ordinances on soil erosion and sedimentation control.

Local governments shall identify existing river corridors and shall adopt river corridor protection plans as part of their planning process. Local governments may exempt from the planning process:

Land uses existing prior to the promulgation of a river corridor protection plan from the criteria of the river corridor protection plan;

Mining activities permitted by the Department of Natural Resources pursuant to Part 3 of Article 2 of Chapter 4 of this title, the "Georgia Surface Mining Act of 1968," from the criteria of the river corridor protection plan;

Utilities from the buffer and set-back area criteria of the river corridor protection plan if such utilities cannot feasibly be located outside of such areas, provided that:

The utilities shall be located as far from the stream bank as reasonably possible;

The installation and maintenance of the utilities shall be such as to protect the integrity of the buffer and set-back areas as well as is reasonably possible; and

The utilities shall not impair the drinking quality of the stream water; and

Specific forestry and agricultural activities from buffer and set-back criteria in accordance with the following conditions:

The activity shall be consistent with the best management practices established by the State Forestry Commission or the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission; and

The activity shall not impair the drinking quality of the stream water as defined by the federal Clean Water Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-217);

River corridors shall be appropriately identified and mapped in the land use plans developed by local and regional governments. Such land use plans shall address, at a minimum, the following considerations with regard to river corridors:

Whether the impact the land use plan has on an area would adversely affect the public health, safety, welfare, or the property of others;

Whether the area is unique or significant in the conservation and movement of flora and fauna including threatened, rare, or endangered species;

Whether alteration or the effects of alteration to river corridors will adversely affect the function, including the flow or quality of water, cause erosion or shoaling, or have an adverse impact on navigation;

Whether modification or the effects of modification by a project would adversely affect fishing or recreational use of river corridors;

Whether an alteration or the effects of alteration would be temporary in nature;

Whether the project contains significant state historical and archeological resources, defined as "Properties on or Eligible for the National Register of Historic Places"; and

Whether alteration of river corridors would have a measurably adverse impact on adjacent sensitive natural areas;

Land use plans shall provide the following acceptable uses of river corridors without long-term impairment of functions:

Timber production and harvesting;

Wildlife and fisheries management;

Waste-water treatment;

Recreation;

Natural water quality treatment or purification;

Agriculture production and management; and

Other uses including those permitted by the Department of Natural Resources or under Section 404 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act as amended by the federal Clean Water Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-217).

The following uses shall not be acceptable:

Receiving areas for toxic or hazardous waste or other contaminants;

Hazardous or sanitary waste landfills; and

Other uses unapproved by local governments;

The provisions of this subsection shall apply to each local government which contains within its boundaries any river corridor.

The department shall, by January 1, 1992, promulgate the minimum standards and procedures for protection of mountains referred to in subsection (b) of this Code section including, but not limited to, land-disturbing activities within protected mountain areas. Such standards shall include, but are not limited to:

The proposed land-disturbing activity must meet all applicable requirements of Chapter 7 of this title, the "Erosion and Sedimentation Act of 1975," and of any applicable local ordinances on soil erosion and sedimentation control;

Where one or more septic tanks are to be used for individual sewage disposal, the proposed land-disturbing activity must meet all applicable requirements imposed by the local governing authority;

Where one or more wells are to be used for individual water supply, the proposed land-disturbing activity must meet all applicable requirements of Part 3 of Article 3 of Chapter 5 of this title, the "Water Well Standards Act of 1985," the requirements of the rules and regulations of the Department of Public Health regarding individual or nonpublic wells, and any more stringent requirements imposed by the local governing authority;

If sewage treatment is to be provided by any means other than one or more individual septic tanks, the sewage treatment must meet all applicable requirements of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title, the "Georgia Water Quality Control Act";

If a public water supply system is to be provided, the water supply system must meet all applicable requirements of Part 5 of Article 3 of Chapter 5 of this title, the "Georgia Safe Drinking Water Act of 1977";

No single-family residences may be constructed at a density of more than one per acre, but no such acre shall be less than 100 feet wide at the building site, except that this density restriction shall not apply to:

Any lot of less than one acre if such lot was as of July 1, 1991, owned and described as a discrete parcel of real property according to the instrument of title of the person or persons owning the lot on July 1, 1991; or such lot was as of July 1, 1991, shown as a discrete parcel of real property on a plat of survey properly recorded in the real property records of the clerk of superior court by the person or persons owning the lot on July 1, 1991; or

Any land or part of any land which was contained in or subject to any master plan, planned unit development, special approved development plan, or any other development plan if such plan was filed with and approved by the local governing authority prior to July 1, 1991, pursuant to a duly enacted planning and zoning ordinance; provided, further, that any such planning and zoning ordinance must have provided for rules and procedures and governed lot sizes, density, types of buildings, and other limitations usually associated with the implementation of local zoning ordinances;

No multifamily residences may be constructed at a density of more than four dwelling units per acre, except where there is a public water supply and sewerage system available to this property then the density may be increased to no more than six dwelling units per acre, but no such acre shall be less than 100 feet wide at the building site;

Any application for a building permit to construct a commercial structure shall contain a detailed landscaping plan. Such landscaping plan shall identify all trees which are to be removed that exceed eight inches in diameter as measured at a point on such tree four and one-half feet above the surface of the ground and shall contain a plan for replacement of any such trees that are removed. Such application shall also include a topographical survey of the project site and an assessment of the impact that the project will have on the environment of the protected mountain after it has been completed and is in operation. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to require commercial structures to comply with the density provision of paragraphs (6) and (7) of this subsection;

No structure may extend more than 40 feet, as measured from the highest point at which the foundation of such structure intersects the ground, above the uppermost point of the crest, summit, or ridge top of the protected mountain on which the structure is constructed; provided, however, that this height restriction shall not apply to water, radio, or television towers or any equipment for the transmission of electricity or to minor vertical projections of a parent building, including chimneys, flagpoles, flues, spires, steeples, belfries, cupolas, antennas, poles, wires, or windmills; and

No person engaging in land-disturbing activity shall remove more than 50 percent of the existing trees which exceed eight inches in diameter as measured at a point on such tree four and one-half feet above the surface of the ground unless such person has filed with the application a plan of reforestation developed by a registered forester.

(Code 1981, §

12-2-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 5.1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1719, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 12; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 12/HB 142; Ga. L. 2014, p. 597, § 1/SB 299; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 12/HB 90; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 12/HB 323.)

Cross references.

- Stream buffers,

§§

12-5-451

,

12-5-453

,

12-5-582

,

12-7-6

.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, "minimum" was substituted for "miminum" in the first sentence of subsection (g).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "two-acre" was substituted for "two acre" in subparagraph (g)(1)(A).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, "State Soil and Water Conservation Commission" was substituted for "Georgia Soil and Water Conservation Commission" in division (g)(2)(D)(i).

Editor's notes.

- By resolution (Ga. L. 1990, p. 406), the General Assembly ratified the initial minimum standards and procedures for the protection of the natural resources, environment, and vital areas of the state adopted by the Department and Board of Natural Resources on December 6, 1989.

Law reviews.

-
For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).
For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 11 (1992).

12-2-9. Accreditation of commercial analytical laboratories submitting regulatory data.

All commercial analytical laboratories submitting data for regulatory purposes shall be accredited or approved as specified in the Environmental Protection Division's rules and regulations. Such regulations shall provide for procedures, identification of accrediting organizations, reciprocity, and an effective date which allows a phase-in period; provided, however, that the effective date of such rules and regulations shall be on or after July 1, 2001. This Code section shall not apply to turbidity data submitted pursuant to individual or general permits for storm-water discharges from construction activities authorized in subparagraphs (a)(1)(N) and (a)(1)(O) of Code Section 12-5-23.

(Code 1981, §

12-2-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 574, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 213, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 317, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 12.)

12-2-10. Qualifications to practice public soil science.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Public practice of soil science" means any service or work, the adequate performance of which requires education in the physical, chemical, and biological sciences, as well as soil science; training and experience in the application of special knowledge of these sciences to the use and management of soils by accepted principles and methods; investigation, evaluation, and consultation in the use and management of soils; and in which the performance is related to the public welfare by safeguarding life, health, property, and the environment. The term includes, but is not limited to, investigating and evaluating the interaction between water, soil, nutrients, plants, and other living organisms that are used to prepare soil scientists' reports for subsurface ground absorption systems, including infiltration galleries; land application of residuals such as sludge, septage, and other wastes; spray irrigation of waste water; soil remediation at conventional rates; land application of agricultural products and processing residues; bioremediation and volatilization; soil erodibility and sedimentation; and identification of hydric soil and redoximorphic features.

"Soil science" means the science dealing with soils as an environmental resource. Soil science includes soil characterization, classification, and mapping; the physical, chemical, hydrologic, mineralogical, biological, and microbiological analysis of soil; and the assessment, analysis, modeling, testing, evaluation, and use of soil for the benefit of mankind. Soil science does not include design or creative works, the adequate performance of which requires extensive geological, engineering, land surveying, forestry, or landscape architecture education, training, and experience or requires registration as a geologist under Chapter 19 of Title 43, professional engineer or land surveyor under Chapter 15 of Title 43, or forester under Part 2 of Article 1 of Chapter 6 of this title or licensing as a landscape architect under Chapter 23 of Title 43.

"Soil scientist" means a person who engages in the public practice of soil science.

Any person who:

Holds at least a bachelor's degree in science from an accredited college or university with a major in soil science or a related field of science, which degree includes a minimum of 30 semester hours or equivalent quarter credit hours in agricultural, biological, chemical, physical, or earth sciences, with a minimum of 15 semester credit hours or equivalent quarter credit hours in soil science courses; and

Has at least four years of work experience as a soil scientist under the supervision of a person who meets the qualifications of paragraph (1) of this subsection and who provides satisfactory evidence of such qualifications to the department

shall be authorized and qualified, for purposes of assisting persons in meeting the requirements of this title, to engage in the public practice of soil science on behalf of such persons and submit soil science evaluations and reports to the department when such are required for purposes of satisfying requirements of this title, and such reports by a soil scientist shall be accepted by the department for such purposes.

This Code section shall not be construed to prevent or affect:

The practice of registered professional engineers from lawfully practicing soil mechanics, foundation engineering, and other professional engineering as provided in Chapter 15 of Title 43; or

Persons registered as professional engineers or professional geologists from practicing soil science within their areas of engineering or geologic competency.

It shall be unlawful for a soil scientist to engage in the design of engineering works and systems unless the soil scientist is also a registered professional engineer under Chapter 15 of Title 43.

(Code 1981, §

12-2-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 542, § 1/SB 226.)

12-2-11. Control of aviation; power of department.

The department shall be authorized to acquire, operate, maintain, house, and dispose of all state aviation assets assigned to the department, to provide aviation services and oversight of such state aircraft and aviation operations for the mission of the department and legitimate state business purposes, to achieve policy objectives through aviation missions, and to provide for the efficient operation of such state aircraft.

All aircraft under the custody and control of the Georgia Aviation Authority as of June 30, 2012, which were previously transferred to the authority by the department and associated parts and equipment and any budgeted operating funds associated with such aircraft shall be transferred on July 1, 2012, back to the custody and control of the department.

Any persons who as of June 30, 2012, were employed by the Georgia Aviation Authority pursuant to previous transfer from the department to the authority shall be transferred back to the department on July 1, 2012, and shall no longer be under the administration or direction of the authority.

All airfields and appurtenances, including hangars, previously transferred to the Georgia Aviation Authority by the department and all accounts receivable, budgeted operating funds, other funds, contracts, liabilities, and obligations associated with the aircraft being transferred back to the department as of July 1, 2012, shall become the property, accounts receivable, budgeted operating funds, other funds, contracts, liabilities, and obligations of the department on such date.

The department shall be responsible for providing aviation services in support of the mission of the department. The department shall be authorized to dispose of any state aircraft assigned to the department and apply the proceeds derived therefrom to the purchase of replacement aviation assets.

The department shall have the power to:

Hire, organize, and train personnel to operate, maintain, house, purchase, and dispose of aviation assets;

Purchase, lease, maintain, develop, and modify facilities to support aviation assets and operations;

Develop operating, maintenance, safety, security, training, education, and scheduling standards for department aviation operations and conduct inspections, audits, and other similar oversight to determine practices and compliance with such standards;

Develop an accountability system for department aviation operations and activities;

Identify the costs associated with training, education, and the purchase, operation, maintenance, and administration of state aircraft assigned to the department and aviation operations and related facilities;

In conjunction with the Georgia Aviation Authority, develop an appropriate joint billing structure for passenger transportation where the aircraft is designated and operated as a "civil aircraft" under Part 91 of the Federal Aviation Regulations and charge agencies and other state entities for the full variable hourly costs for the operation of each type of aircraft, evaluated annually and adjusted as necessary based upon the price of fuel, maintenance, and other fees that are a direct result of flying the aircraft on that specific trip; provided, however, that any billing to an agency by the department shall be suspended whenever the Governor declares a state of emergency on any cost associated with aircraft used during and in response to such state of emergency;

Retain appropriate external consulting and auditing expertise;

Engage aviation industry representatives to ensure best practices for department aviation assets;

Delegate certain powers pursuant to this article to other state entities;

Otherwise implement appropriate and efficient management practices for department aviation operations; and

Enter into agreements with the Georgia Aviation Authority for mutual use of state airfields and appurtenances, including aircraft hangars.

(Code 1981, §

12-2-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1082, § 2/SB 339.)

Cross references.

- Aviation authority, T. 6, C. 5.